Louisiana, session 2026, HB826.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1598(A) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1598. Referrals
A. Any person or entity who is not licensed to sell insurance may refer a
customer to a person, or the telephone number of a person, who sells or provides
consumer by telephone number, electronic mail address, or website or provide a
direct referral to a person or an insurance company, including affiliates or partners,
that sells or provides opinions or advice on any insurance product.
B. Any compensation received by the person or entity making a referral
provided for in Subsection A of this Section shall not be in the form of a sales
commission and shall not be nor based on the application by the customer or
consumer's eventual purchase of insurance.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.